District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Streatery Program Endorsements and Protest Process Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Title 25 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 25-101 is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (50A) is added to read as follows:
“(50A) “Streatery” means the occupation of the parking lane of a roadway or use
of designated parts of an alley network or travel lane used specifically for outdoor dining
pursuant to a valid Streatery Permit issued by the District Department of Transportation and
Certificate of Use issued by the Department of Buildings.”.
(2) A new paragraph (55A) is added to read as follows:
“(55A) “Washington Convention and Sports Authority food and alcohol business”
means a retailer with commercial street frontage at a location under the jurisdiction of the
Washington Convention and Sports Authority that sells food and is approved by the Washington
Convention and Sports Authority to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption.”.
(b) Section 25-113(a)(6) is amended as follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Strike the phrase “2022 and 2023” wherever it appears and insert the phrase
“2022, 2023, 2024, and through December 31, 2025” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (A)(i)(II) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the
phrase “annually with the fee for 2025 due by April 1, 2025; except, that an on-premises retailer
licensee, class C/T, D/T, C/N, or D/N, or a manufacturer licensee class B, shall pay the fee for
2025 by September 30, 2025;” in its place.
(3) A new subparagraph (F) is added to read as follows:
“(F) After December 31, 2025, the provisions of § 25-113.01(c-1) shall
apply to any establishment that wishes to sell, serve, or permit the consumption of beer, wine, or
spirits to patrons on a streatery.”.
(c) Section 25-113.01 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c)(1) The licensee under a manufacturer’s license class A, B, or C holding an on-site
sales and consumption permit or an on-premises license, class C/R, D/R, C/H, D/H, C/T, D/T,
C/N, D/N, C/X, D/X, C/B, and D/B, shall obtain a sidewalk café endorsement or summer garden
endorsement from the Board to be eligible to conduct business operations on a sidewalk café or
summer garden, which may include the sale, service, and consumption of alcoholic beverages on
outdoor public or private space.
“(2) A Washington Convention and Sports Authority food and alcohol business
shall obtain a sidewalk café license from the Board to be eligible to conduct business operations
on a sidewalk café, which may include the sale, service, and consumption of alcoholic beverages
on outdoor public space.
“(3) If a licensee holding a sidewalk café or summer garden endorsement under
this subsection fails to comply with the terms of this subsection or the endorsement, the Board
may fine the licensee or suspend or revoke its license and may revoke the endorsement.”.
(2) Subsection (c-1) is amended to read as follows:
“(c-1)(1) Beginning January 1, 2026, no establishment may sell, serve, or permit the
consumption of beer, wine, or spirits to patrons on a streatery without the appropriate
endorsement or license provided pursuant to this subsection.
“(2) The Board shall establish:
“(A) A streatery endorsement for establishments licensed as on-premises
retailers or manufacturers with an on-site sales and consumption permit and permitted hours for
hours of operation and the sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic beverages;
“(B) A streatery license for Washington Convention and Sports Authority
food and beverage businesses and permitted hours for hours of operation and the sales, service,
and consumption of alcoholic beverages; and
“(C) A common application for establishments seeking to obtain the
appropriate endorsement or license.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) An establishment seeking a streatery endorsement or license pursuant to this
subsection shall:
“(A) Demonstrate that it operates a streatery;
“(B) Pay a $100 fee accompanying its application and annually thereafter
by a date set by the Board;
“(C) Demonstrate that the streatery is located in a commercial or mixed-
use zone as defined in the District's zoning regulations; and
“(D) Agree to maintain its own clearly delineated streatery that does not
share tables and chairs with another business.
“(4)(A) As of January 1, 2026, an establishment that registered with the Board
pursuant to § 25-113(a)(6) shall be deemed to be in violation of this subsection if it continues to
sell, serve, or permit the consumption of beer, wine, or spirits to patrons in outdoor spaces
unless:
“(i) If the establishment operates a streatery, it submits an
application to the Board for the appropriate endorsement or license by December 31, 2025; or
“(ii) If the establishment operates an outdoor space that qualifies as
a summer garden or sidewalk café, it applies for a summer garden or sidewalk café endorsement
or license, as appropriate, by December 31, 2025.
“(B) An applicant that registered with the Board pursuant to § 25-
113(a)(6) and filed its application for the a streatery, summer garden, or sidewalk café
endorsement or license by December 31, 2025, may continue to sell, serve, or permit the
consumption of beer, wine, or spirits to patrons consistent with that registration until the Board
renders a decision on its application.
“(5) If a licensee holding a streatery endorsement under this subsection fails to
comply with the terms of this subsection or the endorsement, the Board may fine the licensee or
suspend or revoke its license and may revoke the endorsement.
“(6)(A) The Board shall interpret settlement-agreement language that restricts
sidewalk cafés or summer gardens as applying only to those outdoor spaces that are currently
approved by the Board as sidewalk cafés or summer gardens.
“(B) The Board shall not interpret settlement-agreement language that
restricts or prohibits sidewalk cafés or summer gardens to apply to streateries.”.
(3) Subsection (g)(1) is amended as follows:
(A) Designate the existing text as subparagraph (A).
(B) A new subparagraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) Effective January 1, 2026, a Washington Convention and Sports
Authority food and alcohol business that is not already licensed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of
this paragraph shall obtain a carry out and delivery license from the Board to be eligible to sell
beer, wine, or spirits in closed containers to individuals for carry out, or deliver beer, wine, or
spirits in closed containers to consumers in the District.”.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(d) Section 25-421 is amended by adding a new subsection (a-1) is added to read as
follows:
“(a-1) For the purposes of subsection (a) of this section, an application for a streatery,
sidewalk café, or summer garden endorsement or license shall be considered to be a substantial
change in operation and subject to the notice requirements of this section.”.
(e) Section 25-601 is amended by adding a new subsection (c) to read as follows:
“(c) For the purposes of this section, an application for a streatery, sidewalk café, or
summer garden endorsement or license shall be considered to be a substantial change in
operation.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4